Maine, session 132, LD783.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
EDUCATION, DEPARTMENT OF
Adult Education 0364
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to the Maine Multicultural Center in Bangor for one or
more positions to establish a comprehensive program for foreign-trained workers through
the Maine Multicultural Center. The position or positions will develop and coordinate the
comprehensive program, which must be designed to serve foreign-trained workers with an
emphasis on serving foreign-trained professionals and seek private funds to support the
center's programs and operations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $0 $47,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $0 $47,000
Page 1 - 132LR1679(06)